Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.700.040

Performance measures and targets—Improvement plans—Denial of approval or reapproval of program.

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall establish performance measures and targets and monitor the performance of career and technical education programs in at least the following areas:

(a) Student participation in and completion of high-demand programs as identified under RCW 28A.700.020;

(b) Students earning dual credit for high school and college; and

(c) Performance measures and targets established by the workforce training and education coordinating board, including but not limited to student academic and technical skill attainment, graduation rates, postgraduation employment or enrollment in postsecondary education, and other measures and targets as required by the federal Carl Perkins act, as amended.

(2) If a school district fails to meet the performance targets established under this section, the office of the superintendent of public instruction may require the district to submit an improvement plan. If a district fails to implement an improvement plan or continues to fail to meet the performance targets for three consecutive years, the office of the superintendent of public instruction may use this failure as the basis to deny the approval or reapproval of one or more of the district's career and technical education programs.

[ 2008 c 170 s 104.]